District of Columbia statutes.
38-235

Suspension and expulsion report.

Within 180 calendar days of September 19, 2013, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall submit to the Mayor and the Secretary to the Council a report with findings and recommendations to aid each educational institution to eliminate out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, except for those students who pose a reasonable threat of death or serious bodily harm to themselves or others or violate Part A of this subchapter [§ 38-231 et seq.].

History

Sept. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 20-17, § 201, 60 DCR 9839